Washington statutes.
RCW 18.220.901

Effective date—2000 c 253.

(1) Sections 1, 3, 7, 9, 10, 11, 12, 14, 15, 16, 17, 20, and 21 of this act take effect July 1, 2001.

(2) Sections 2, 18, and 19 of this act take effect July 1, 2002.

(3) Sections 4, 5, 6, 8, and 13 of this act take effect April 1, 2001.

[ 2001 c 61 s 1; 2000 c 253 s 23.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 61: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 18, 2001]." [ 2001 c 61 s 2.]